Montana, session 2025, SB352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Legislative immunity for legislative staff. (1) Evidentiary privilege and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 352

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 352.1
legislative speech and debate immunity extends to legislative staff. Legislative staff may not be questioned in a
judicial proceeding or compelled to testify in any other place regarding privileged legislative information. The
privilege applies to information that is controlled by or in the possession of legislative staff as long as the same
information would be treated as privileged legislative information if it was under the control or possession of a
legislator.
(2) Legislative staff may not disclose privileged legislative information, which must be treated as
confidential information. The introduction or public discussion of a bill by a legislator does not waive the
privilege provided by this section.

Section 2. Section 2-9-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-9-101. Definitions. As used in parts 1 through 3 of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Claim" means any claim against a governmental entity, for money damages only, that any
person is legally entitled to recover as damages because of personal injury or property damage caused by a
negligent or wrongful act or omission committed by any employee of the governmental entity while acting within
the scope of employment, under circumstances where the governmental entity, if a private person, would be
liable to the claimant for the damages under the laws of the state. For purposes of this section and the limit of
liability contained in 2-9-108, all claims that arise or derive from personal injury to or death of a single person, or
damage to property of a person, regardless of the number of persons or entities claiming damages, are
considered one claim.
(2) (a) "Employee" means an officer, employee, or servant of a governmental entity, including
elected or appointed officials, and persons acting on behalf of the governmental entity in any official capacity
temporarily or permanently in the service of the governmental entity whether with or without compensation.
(b) The term does not mean a person or other legal entity while acting in the capacity of an
independent contractor under contract to the governmental entity to which parts 1 through 3 apply in the event
of a claim.
(3) "Governmental entity" means the state and political subdivisions.
(4) "Legislative staff" means:
(a) (i) except as provided in subsection (4)(b), an employee or contractor of an entity of the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 352

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 352.1
legislative branch that is consolidated as provided in 5-2-504;
(ii) personal staff of legislative leadership provided for in 2-18-104; or
(iii) an attorney or consultant hired by legislative leadership as a personal service contractor using
state funding.
(b) The term does not include an entity of the legislative branch or an employee of the legislative
audit division.
(5) "Legislator" means a member of the legislature and includes a person elected to serve in the
next legislative session.
(4)(6) "Personal injury" means any injury resulting from libel, slander, malicious prosecution, or false
arrest and any bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death sustained by any person and caused by an occurrence
for which the state may be held liable.
(7) "Privileged legislative information" means any information that is protected from disclosure by a
legislator based on the common law, constitutional law, or statutory legislative immunity.
(5)(8) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, municipal corporation, school district, special
improvement or taxing district, other political subdivision or public corporation, or any entity created by
agreement between two or more political subdivisions.
(6)(9) "Property damage" means injury or destruction to tangible property, including loss of use of the
property, caused by an occurrence for which the state may be held liable.
(7)(10) "State" means the state of Montana or any office, department, agency, authority, commission,
board, institution, hospital, college, university, or other instrumentality of the state."

Section 3. Section 2-9-901, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-9-901. (Temporary) Definitions. As used in this part, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Covid-19" means the novel coronavirus identified as SARS-CoV-2, the disease caused by the
novel coronavirus SARS-CoV-2 or a virus mutating from it, and conditions associated with the disease caused
by the novel coronavirus SARS-CoV-2 or a virus mutating from it.
(2) "Government entity" means the state and political subdivisions, including but not limited to:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 352

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 352.1
(a) political subdivisions as defined in 2-9-101(5);
(b) the legislature, legislative committees, and legislators acting in their official capacity; and
(c) employees of the state or a political subdivision.
(3) "Health care provider" means a health care professional, whether the health care professional
works for a health care provider or a government health care provider, health care facility, home health care
facility, assisted living facility, or any other person or facility otherwise authorized or permitted by any federal or
state statute, regulation, order, or public health guidance to administer health care services or treatment.
(4) "Person" means an individual, corporation, nonprofit corporation, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, business or similar trust, association, joint venture, place of worship, personal
representative, trustee, government entity, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(5) "Premises" includes any real property and any appurtenant building or structure, as well as any
other location, vehicle, or place serving a commercial, residential, educational, religious, governmental, cultural,
charitable, or health care purpose.
(6) "Public health guidance" includes guidance related to covid-19 issued by the following:
(a) the centers for disease control and prevention of the United States department of health and
human services;
(b) the centers for medicare and medicaid services of the United States department of health and
human services;
(c) the federal occupational safety and health administration;
(d) the office of the governor;
(e) a state agency, including the Montana department of public health and human services; or
(f) a local government, including a local government health department or local government board
of health. (Terminates December 31, 2031--sec. 12, Ch. 516, L. 2021.)"

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 2, chapter 9, part 1, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 9, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 352

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 352.1
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 352